Louisiana, session 2026, HB1117.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:868(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§868. Limiting actions; jurisdiction; venue
* * *
B.(1) No insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state and
covering subjects located, resident, or to be performed in this state, or any health and
accident policy insuring a resident of this state regardless of where made or
delivered, shall contain any condition, stipulation, or agreement limiting right of
action against the insurer to a period of less than twenty-four months next after the
inception of the loss when the claim is a first-party claim, as defined in R.S. 22:1692,
and arises under any insurance classified and defined in R.S. 22:47(6), (10), (11),
(12), (13), (15), and (19) or to a period of less than one year from the time when the
cause of action accrues in connection with all other insurances unless otherwise
specifically provided in this Code. An insurer's payment under the terms of a policy
of insurance classified and defined in R.S. 22:47(6), (10) through (13), (15), and (19)
shall not be considered the acknowledgment of a debt or otherwise serve to extend
the contractually defined prescriptive period which begins running at the inception
of the loss.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1117 ENROLLED
(2) If an insurer issues an unconditional payment on a claim filed under the
dwelling coverage or other structures coverage of a homeowners' policy, the insurer
shall provide written notice to the claimant that the payment does not interrupt,
suspend, or otherwise extend the prescription period applicable to the claim.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 22:868(B)(2) as amended and reenacted by Section
1 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
Section 3. Section 2, the provisions of R.S. 22:868(B)(1) as amended and reenacted
by Section 1, and Section 3 of this Act shall become effective upon signature by the
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.